Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Second Supplemental Housing Authority Law

§ 43-33-61.
Payments by housing authorities to local bodies.

Notwithstanding any limitations in other laws, an authority may agree to make such payments to the city or county, the state, or any political subdivision thereof (which payments such bodies are hereby authorized to accept) as the authority finds consistent with the maintenance of the low-rent character of housing projects or the achievement of the purposes of Sections 43-33-61 through 43-33-69 and the Housing Authorities Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7322-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 5.

§ 43-33-63.
Housing research and studies.

In addition to all its other powers, a housing authority may, within its area of operation, undertake and carry out studies and analyses of the housing needs, and of the meeting of such needs (including data with respect to population and family groups and the distribution thereof according to income groups, the amount and quality of available housing and its distribution according to rentals and sales prices, employment, wages and other factors affecting the local housing needs and the meeting thereof) and make the results of such studies and analyses available to the public and the building, housing and supply industries; and may also engage in research and disseminate information on the subject of housing.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7322-02; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 6.

§ 43-33-65.
Short title.

Sections 43-33-61 and 43-33-63 may be referred to as the “Second Supplemental Housing Authorities Law.” The Housing Authorities Law, the Supplemental Housing Authorities Law and the Second Supplemental Housing Authorities Law may be referred to as the “Housing Authorities Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7322-03; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 7.

§ 43-33-67.
Supplemental nature of law.

The powers conferred by Sections 43-33-61 and 43-33-63 shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7322-04; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 8.

§ 43-33-69.
Law as controlling.

Insofar as the provisions of this second supplemental Housing Authorities Law are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this law shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7322-06; Laws, 1946, ch. 403, § 10.